Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,229
Forcible entry and detainer; exceptions.

Exceptions to the opinion of the judge of the court, in cases under sections 25-21,219 to 25-21,235, upon questions of law and evidence, may be taken by either party, whether tried by a jury or otherwise.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 128, p. 311;

C.S.1929, § 22-1212;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,129;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 79;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-579.